District of Columbia statutes.
38-157

Contracting out of food services operations and security services; development of management and data systems.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation, the District of Columbia Public Schools shall contract out, beginning in School Year 1995-96 and Fiscal Year 1996, all food services operations and security services for the D.C. Public Schools unless the Chancellor determines that it is not feasible.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation, the District of Columbia Public Schools shall contract out for no more than a 3-year period, beginning in School Year 1995-96 and Fiscal Year 1996, the development of new management and data systems, as well as training of currently employed personnel to use and manage these systems, in the areas of budget, finance, personnel/human resources, management information services, procurement, and supply management.

March 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 1203, 43 DCR 5
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1007, 54 DCR 4102
1981 Ed., § 31-121.
D.C. Law 17-9 substituted “District of Columbia Public Schools” for “District of Columbia Board of Education” and “Chancellor” for “Superintendent”.